Missouri, session 2026, HB3366.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the state of Missouri, as follows:
Section A. Chapter 9, RSMo, is amended by adding thereto one new section, to be
2 known as section 9.358, to read as follows:
9.358. April twenty-second each year is hereby designated as "Missouri Black
2 Bear Awareness Day". Citizens of this state are encouraged to participate in
3 appropriate events and activities to provide education about efforts to conserve
4 Missouri's black bear population.
✔
EXPLANATION — Matter enclosed in bold-faced brackets [thus] in the above bill is not enacted and is
intended to be omitted from the law. Matter in bold-face type in the above bill is proposed language.